North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-05 Annuity, Safe Deposit, Surety, and Trust Companies
6-05-25.
When subscribed capital stock must be paid in. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 142, § 4; R.C. 1899, § 3115e; S.L. 1903, ch. 113, § 7; R.C.1905, § 4461; C.L. 1913, § 4910; R.C. 1943, § 6-0525; repealed by 2015, ch. 80, § 8, effective July 1, 2015.

6-05-26.
Increase in capital stock — Action by stockholders — Report to state banking board.

The capital stock of such a corporation may be increased from time to time by a majority vote of its stockholders. Such action may be taken at any regularly called general or special meeting held upon sixty days’ notice, when in the notice of such meeting the object thereof has been set out fully. No such increase of capital stock is valid unless paid in, in cash, and reported to the state banking board in writing, verified by the oath of the president, secretary, or managing officer of the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 142, § 13; R.C. 1899, § 3258o; R.C. 1905, § 4691; C.L. 1913, § 5219; S.L. 1931, ch. 63, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 6-0526; 2013, ch. 77, § 21.

Cross-References.

Securities of national bank and trust company exempt from regulation of chapter 10-04, see § 10-04-05, subs. 2.

6-05-27.
Commissioner to order increase in security deposit — When.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner, from an examination of the business of any such corporation, that the deposit made by it, as hereinbefore required, is insufficient to insure the safety of its deposit, trust, and contingent liabilities, the commissioner shall make an order, as hereinafter provided, requiring an increase of such deposit. Such company immediately upon receipt of such order shall deposit with the commissioner, or a designated agent, other and further securities of the kind, class, and value designated in section 6-05-04 in an amount sufficient to comply with said order.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 142, § 13; R.C. 1899, § 3258o; R.C. 1905, § 4691; C.L. 1913, § 5219; S.L. 1931, ch. 93, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 6-0527; S.L. 1989, ch. 113, § 4.

Cross-References.

Property of insolvent bank exempt from attachment and execution; appointment of receiver postponed, see § 6-07-04.

6-05-28.
Examination by commissioner — Fees — Power over business, officers, and employees.

The commissioner shall make a full, true, complete, and accurate examination and investigation of the affairs of each corporation doing business under this chapter as often as the commissioner deems necessary. Such examination may be made without previous notice to the corporation to be examined. Fees for such examinations must be charged by the department of financial institutions at an hourly rate to be set by the commissioner, sufficient to cover all reasonable expenses of the department associated with the examinations provided for by this section. Fees must be paid to the department of financial institutions and deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund. The commissioner, in the commissioner’s discretion, may accept, in lieu of any examination authorized or required by this title to be conducted by the department of financial institutions, the examination that may have been made of such institution within a reasonable period by the federal reserve bank or federal deposit insurance corporation, if a copy of such examination is furnished to the commissioner. The commissioner shall assume and exercise over each such corporation and its business, officers, directors, and employees all the power and authority conferred upon the commissioner over financial or moneyed corporations or associations.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 142, § 12; R.C. 1899, § 3258p; S.L. 1903, ch. 195, § 3; R.C. 1905, § 4692; C.L. 1913, § 5220; S.L. 1931, ch. 93, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 6-0528; S.L. 1979, ch. 131, § 1; 1983, ch. 110, § 3; 1987, ch. 111, § 1; 1989, ch. 96, § 2; 2001, ch. 88, § 19; 2013, ch. 77, § 22; 2019, ch. 123, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

6-05-29.
Duty of commissioner when examination discloses violation of law.

If it appears to the commissioner from any examination made by the commissioner that any such corporation has committed a violation of the law or that it is conducting its business in an unsafe or unauthorized manner, or that the deposit made by it with the department of financial institutions, as hereinbefore provided, is insufficient to protect the interests of all concerned, the commissioner, by an order addressed to such corporation, shall direct the discontinuance of such illegal or unsafe practice, and order it to conform with the requirements of the law or to make a further deposit with the department of financial institutions in an amount sufficient to insure the safety of its trusts, deposits, and liabilities. Whenever any corporation refuses to comply with any such order, or whenever it appears to the commissioner that it is unsafe or inexpedient for any such corporation to continue to transact business, the commissioner shall communicate the facts to the attorney general, who thereupon shall institute such proceedings against any such corporation as the case may require.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 142, § 14; R.C. 1899, § 3258p; S.L. 1903, ch. 195, § 3; R.C. 1905, § 4692; C.L. 1913, § 5220; S.L. 1931, ch. 93, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 6-0529; 2013, ch. 77, § 23.

6-05-30.
Conditions under which foreign corporation may do fidelity and surety business. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 332, § 26.

6-05-31.
Service on foreign corporation doing fidelity and surety business. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 332, § 26.

6-05-32.
Foreign corporation doing fidelity or surety business to pay tax — To whom paid — How determined. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 332, § 26.

6-05-33.
Responsibility of fidelity and surety corporation for fraud of bonded officer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 332, § 26.

6-05-34.
Other code provisions applicable to corporations doing business under this chapter.

The provisions of title 10, as it may be amended from time to time, governing profit corporations, and sections 6-01-06, 6-01-09, 6-03-11, 6-03-12, 6-03-27, 6-03-33, 6-03-34, 6-03-35, 6-03-41, 6-03-42, 6-03-51, 6-03-52, 6-03-53, 6-03-54, 6-03-55, 6-03-56, 6-03-57, 6-03-58, 6-03-61, 6-03-62, 6-03-63, 6-03-64, 6-03-65, 6-03-70, 6-03-72, chapter 6-07.2, sections 6-08-03, 6-08-06, 6-08-09, 6-08-14, and 6-08-20 are applicable to and must be observed by all corporations organized under this chapter, except as to provisions thereof inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 142, § 2; R.C. 1899, § 3258a; R.C. 1905, § 4677; C.L. 1913, § 5205; S.L. 1931, ch. 93, § 1, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 6-0534; S.L. 1971, ch. 108, § 3; 1977, ch. 71, § 2; 1991, ch. 87, § 2; 2021, ch. 77, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Appointment of receivers, see § 6-01-06.

Profit corporations, see ch. 10-19.1.